hr_HR.aff
FLAG long
SFX XR Y 30
SFX XR an ni an
SFX XR an n/90 na
SFX XR an nog an
SFX XR an noga an
SFX XR an nom an
SFX XR an nome an
SFX XR an nomu an
SFX XR an nim an
SFX XR an no an
SFX XR an na an
SFX XR an ne an
SFX XR an noj an
SFX XR an nih an
SFX XR an nu an
SFX XR an nom an
SFX XR 0 i en
SFX XR 0 0/90 en
SFX XR 0 og en
SFX XR 0 oga en
SFX XR 0 om en
SFX XR 0 ome en
SFX XR 0 omu en
SFX XR 0 im en
SFX XR 0 o en
SFX XR 0 a en
SFX XR 0 e en
SFX XR 0 oj en
SFX XR 0 ih en
SFX XR 0 u en
SFX XR 0 om en

SFX XS Y 4
SFX XS 0 a .
SFX XS 0 u .
SFX XS 0 em [jčćđ]
SFX XS 0 om [^jčćđ]

SFX XT Y 3
SFX XT 0 i .
SFX XT 0 e .
SFX XT 0 ima .

SFX XU Y 5
SFX XU a e a
SFX XU a i a
SFX XU a u a
SFX XU a om a
SFX XU 0 ama a

SFX XV Y 3
SFX XV 0 i st
SFX XV 0 ima st
SFX XV 0 st šću st

SFX XW Y 12
SFX XW 0 og .
SFX XW 0 oga .
SFX XW 0 om .
SFX XW 0 omu .
SFX XW 0 ome .
SFX XW 0 im .
SFX XW 0 i .
SFX XW 0 ih .
SFX XW 0 oj .
SFX XW 0 e . 
SFX XW 0 a .
SFX XW 0 ima .

SFX XX Y 6
SFX XX ar ra ar
SFX XX ar ru ar
SFX XX ar rom ar
SFX XX ar ri ar
SFX XX 0 a ar
SFX XX ar rima ar



SFX CF Y 5
SFX CF 0 og .
SFX CF 0 oga .
SFX CF 0 om .
SFX CF 0 omu .
SFX CF 0 ome .

SFX CG Y 4
SFX CG 0 eg .
SFX CG 0 ega .
SFX CG 0 em .
SFX CG 0 emu .

SFX CH Y 2
SFX CH 0 e .
SFX CH 0 ih .

SFX CI Y 1
SFX CI 0 0/92 .

SFX CJ Y 2
SFX CJ an n/93 an
SFX CJ ar r/93 ar

SFX CK Y 1
SFX CK 0 0/93 .

SFX CL Y 2
SFX CL 0 0/92 i
SFX CL i 0/93 i

SFX CM Y 1
SFX CM i 0/94 i
